Texas statutes.
GOVERNMENT CODE

TITLE 2. JUDICIAL BRANCH

SUBTITLE B. JUDGES

CHAPTER 36. JUDICIAL REPORTS

Sec. 36.001. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "Competency evaluator" means a physician or psychologist who is licensed or certified in this state and who performs examinations to determine whether an individual is incapacitated or has an intellectual disability for purposes of appointing a guardian for the individual. The term includes physicians and psychologists conducting examinations under Sections 1101.103 and 1101.104, Estates Code.

(2) "Guardian" has the meaning assigned by Section 1002.012, Estates Code.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1199 (S.B. 1369), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 36.002. APPLICABILITY; CONFLICT OF LAW. (a) This chapter applies to a court in this state created by the Texas Constitution, by statute, or as authorized by statute.

(b) To the extent of a conflict between this chapter and a specific provision relating to a court, this chapter controls.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1199 (S.B. 1369), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 36.003. EXEMPTION. The reporting requirements of Section 36.004 do not apply to:

(1) a mediation conducted by an alternative dispute resolution system established under Chapter 152, Civil Practice and Remedies Code;

(2) information made confidential under state or federal law, including applicable rules;

(3) a guardian ad litem or other person appointed under a program authorized by Section 107.031, Family Code;

(4) an attorney ad litem, guardian ad litem, amicus attorney, or mediator appointed under a domestic relations office established under Chapter 203, Family Code;

(5) an attorney ad litem, guardian ad litem, amicus attorney, or mediator providing services without expectation or receipt of compensation; or

(6) an attorney ad litem, guardian ad litem, amicus attorney, or mediator providing services as a volunteer of a nonprofit organization that provides pro bono legal services to the indigent.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1199 (S.B. 1369), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2015.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 569 (S.B. 41), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 36.004. REPORT ON APPOINTMENTS. (a) In addition to a report required by other state law or rule, the clerk of each court in this state shall prepare a report on court appointments for an attorney ad litem, guardian ad litem, guardian, mediator, or competency evaluator for a case before the court in the preceding month. For a court that does not make an appointment in the preceding month, the clerk of the court must file a report indicating that no appointment was made by the court in that month. The report on court appointments must include:

(1) the name of each person appointed by the court as an attorney ad litem, guardian ad litem, guardian, mediator, or competency evaluator for a case in that month;

(2) the name of the judge and the date of the order approving compensation to be paid to a person appointed as an attorney ad litem, guardian ad litem, guardian, mediator, or competency evaluator for a case in that month;

(3) the number and style of each case in which a person was appointed as an attorney ad litem, guardian ad litem, guardian, mediator, or competency evaluator for that month;

(4) the number of cases each person was appointed by the court to serve as an attorney ad litem, guardian ad litem, guardian, mediator, or competency evaluator in that month;

(5) the total amount of compensation paid to each attorney ad litem, guardian ad litem, guardian, mediator, or competency evaluator appointed by the court in that month and the source of the compensation; and

(6) if the total amount of compensation paid to a person appointed to serve as an attorney ad litem, guardian ad litem, guardian, mediator, or competency evaluator for one appointed case in that month exceeds $1,000, any information related to the case that is available to the court on the number of hours billed to the court for the work performed by the person or the person's employees, including paralegals, and the billed expenses.

(b) Not later than the 15th day of each month, the clerk of a court shall:

(1) submit a copy of the report to the Office of Court Administration of the Texas Judicial System; and

(2) post the report at the courthouse of the county in which the court is located and on any Internet website of the court.

(c) The Office of Court Administration of the Texas Judicial System shall prescribe the format that courts and the clerks of the courts must use to report the information required by this section and shall post the information collected under Subsection (b) on the office's Internet website.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1199 (S.B. 1369), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 36.005. FAILURE TO REPORT. If a court in this state fails to provide to the clerk of the court the information required for the report submitted under Section 36.004, the court is ineligible for any grant money awarded by this state or a state agency for the next state fiscal biennium.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1199 (S.B. 1369), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 36.006. TEXAS JUDICIAL COUNCIL RULES. The Texas Judicial Council shall, as the council considers appropriate, adopt rules to implement this chapter.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1199 (S.B. 1369), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2015.